Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.300

Legislative—Initiative—Conduct of election.

Publication of notice, the election, the canvass of the returns and declaration of the results, shall be conducted in all respects as are other city elections. Any number of proposed ordinances may be voted on at the same election, but there shall not be more than one special election for that purpose during any one six-month period.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.300. Prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 20, part; RRS s 9109, part. (ii) 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]

NOTES:

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.

Conduct of elections—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.